pl: Kolor liści: Niebiesko-zielony; Ciemnozielony; Zielone; Jasnozielony; Wielokolorowe; Fioletowe; Czerwone; Srebrne; Pstre; Żółte; Pozostałe
vi: Màu sắc lá cây: Xanh lục lam; Xanh lục đậm; Màu xanh lá cây; Xanh lục nhạt; Nhiều màu; Màu tím; Màu đỏ; Màu bạc; Loang màu; Màu vàng; Khác
es: Color del follaje: Azul verde; Verde oscuro; Verde; Verde claro; Multicolor; Morado; Rojo; Plateado; Jaspeado; Amarillo; Otros
en: Foliage color: Blue green; Dark green; Green; Light green; Multicolor; Purple; Red; Silver; Variegated; Yellow; Other
da: Bladfarve: Blågrøn; Mørkegrøn; Grøn; Lysegrøn; Flerfarvet; Lilla; Rød; Sølv; Mangefarvet; Gul; Andet
tr: Yaprak rengi: Mavi yeşil; Koyu yeşil; Yeşil; Açık yeşil; Çok renkli; Mor; Kırmızı; Gümüş; Alacalı; Sarı; Diğer
ko: 잎 색상: 청록색; 진녹색; 녹색; 연녹색; 여러 색; 보라색; 빨간색; 은색; 얼룩무늬; 노란색; 기타
ru: Цвет листвы: Сине-зеленый; Темно-зеленый; Зеленый; Светло-зеленый; Многоцветный; Фиолетовый; Красный; Серебристый; Пестрый; Желтый; Другой
sv: Bladfärg: Blågrön; Mörkgrön; Grön; Ljusgrön; Flerfärgad; Lila; Rött; Silver; Brokig; Gul; Övrigt
nl: Bladkleur: Blauwgroen; Donkergroen; Groen; Lichtgroen; Meerkleurig; Paars; Rood; Silver; Bont; Geel; Overig
cs: Barva listí: Modrozelené; Tmavě zelené; Zelená; Světle zelené; Více barev; Purpurová; Červená; Stříbrná; Pestré; Žlutá; Jiné
el: Χρώμα φυλλώματος: Μπλε πράσινο; Σκούρο πράσινο; Πράσινο; Ανοιχτό πράσινο; Πολυχρωμία; Μωβ; Κόκκινο; Ασημί; Ποικιλόχρωμο; Κίτρινο; Άλλο
de: Laubfarbe: Blaugrün; Dunkelgrün; Grün; Hellgrün; Mehrfarbig; Lila; Rot; Silber; Bunt; Gelb; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Cor da folhagem: Azul-esverdeado; Verde escuro; Verde; Verde claro; Multicolorido; Roxo; Vermelho; Prata; Variegado; Amarela; Outro
bg-BG: Цвят на листата: Синьо-зелено; Тъмнозелено; Зелено; Светлозелено; Многоцветно; Лилаво; Червено; Сребърно; Пъстро; Жълто; Друго
th: สีของใบ: สีเขียวอมฟ้า; สีเขียวเข้ม; สีเขียว; สีเขียวอ่อน; หลายสี; สีม่วง; สีแดง; สีเงิน; สีด่าง; สีเหลือง; อื่นๆ
nb: Løvfarge: Blågrønn; Mørk grønn; Grønn; Lys grønn; Flerfarget; Lilla; Rød; Sølv; Spraglete; Gul; Annet
pt-PT: Cor da folhagem: Azul esverdeado; Verde escuro; Verde; Verde claro; Multicor; Roxo; Vermelho; Prata; Variegado; Amarelo; Outro
fi: Lehtien väri: Sinivihreä; Tummanvihreä; Vihreä; Vaaleanvihreä; Monivärinen; Violetti; Punainen; Hopea; Monivärinen; Keltainen; Muu
ro-RO: Culoarea frunzișului: Verde-albastru; Verde închis; Verde; Verde deschis; Multicolor; Purpuriu; Roșu; Argintiu; Pestriț; Galben; Altele
sl-SI: Barva listja: Modro zelena; Temno zelena; Zeleno; Svetlo zelena; Večbarvni; Vijolični; Rdeče; Srebro; Pisano; Rumen; Druga
it: Colore del fogliame: Blu verde; Verde scuro; Verde; Verde chiaro; Multicolore; Viola; Rosso; Argento; Variegato; Giallo; Altro
ja: 葉の色: ブルーグリーン; ダークグリーン; グリーン; ライトグリーン; マルチカラー; パープル; レッド; シルバー; 多色彩; イエロー; その他
hu: Lombozat színe: Kékeszöld; Sötétzöld; Zöld; Világoszöld; Többszínű; Lila; Vörös; Ezüst; Tarka; Sárga; Egyéb
hr-HR: Boja lišća: Plavo-zelena; Tamnozelena; Zelena; Svjetlozelena; Višebojno; Ljubičasta; Crveno; Srebro; Šaroliko; Žuti; Ostalo
sk-SK: Farba lístia: Modrozelená; Tmavozelená; Zelená; Svetlozelená; Viacfarebná; Fialová; Červená; Strieborná; Pestrá; Žltá; Iné
zh-CN: 叶片颜色: 蓝绿色; 深绿色; 绿色; 浅绿色; 多色; 紫色; 红色; 银色; 彩斑; 黄色; 其他
zh-TW: 葉片顏色: 藍綠色; 深綠色; 綠色; 淺綠色; 多色; 紫色; 紅色; 銀色; 斑葉; 黃色; 其他
lt-LT: Lapijos spalva: Mėlynai žalia; Tamsiai žalia; Žalia; Šviesiai žalia; Daugiaspalvis; Violetinė; Raudona; Sidabrinė; Įvairių spalvų; Geltona; Kita
fr: Couleur du feuillage: Bleu vert; Vert foncé; Vert; Vert clair; Multicolore; Violet; Rouge; Argent; Panaché; Jaune; Autre